apertium-gld.gld.lexc
LEXICON POSS-ACC

%<px1sg%>:%>%{б%}и%>в%{A%} K ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>п%{O%}%>в%{A%} K ; 
%<px2sg%>:%>%{б%}%{A%}%>си K ; 
%<px3sg%>:%>%{б%}%{A%}%>ни K ; 
!%<px2pl%>:%>%{б%}%{A%}%>с%{O%} K ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{б%}%{A%}%>с%{O%} K ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{б%}%{A%}%>су K ; 
%<px3pl%>:%>%{б%}%{A%}чи K ; 
%<rxsg%>:%>%{б%}и K ;
%<rxpl%>:%>%{б%}%{A%}ри K ;

LEXICON POSS-LOC

%<px1sg%>:%>и%>в%{A%} K ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>п%{O%}%>в%{A%} K ; 
%<px2sg%>:%>си K ; 
%<px3sg%>:%>%{н%}и K ; 
!%<px2pl%>:%>с%{O%} K ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>су K ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>со K ; 
%<px3pl%>:%>чи K ; 
%<rxsg%>:%>и K ;
%<rxpl%>:%>ри K ;

K ;

LEXICON POSS-NOM

%<px1sg%>:%>%{б%}и K ; 
!%<px1pl%>:%>п%{O%} K ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>пу K ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>по K ; 
%<px2sg%>:%>си K ; 
%<px3sg%>:%>%{н%}и K ; 
!%<px2pl%>:%>с%{O%} K ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>су K ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>со K ; 
%<px3pl%>:%>чи K ; 

K ;

LEXICON POSS-1-OBL

%<px1sg%>:%>и%>в%{A%} K ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>п%{O%}%>в%{A%} K ; 

LEXICON POSS-23-OBL

%<px2sg%>:%>%{A%}%>си K ; 
%<px3sg%>:%>%{A%}%>ни K ; 
!%<px2pl%>:%>%{A%}%>с%{O%} K ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{A%}%>со K ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{A%}%>су K ; 
%<px3pl%>:%>%{A%}%>чи K ; 

LEXICON POSS-REFL 

%<rxsg%>:%>%{б%}и K ;
%<rxpl%>:%>%{A%}ри K ;

LEXICON POSS-OBL

POSS-1-OBL ;
POSS-23-OBL ;
POSS-REFL ;

K ;

LEXICON POSS-OBL-NOREFL

POSS-1-OBL ;
POSS-23-OBL ;

K ;

LEXICON POSS-OBL-NOPASS

POSS-1-OBL ;
POSS-23-OBL ;
POSS-REFL ;

LEXICON CASE 

%<nom%>: POSS-NOM ;
%<acc%>:%>%{в%}%{A%} # ; 
%<acc%>: POSS-ACC ; 
%<dat%>:%>д%{O%} POSS-OBL ; 
%<dat%>:%>ду # ;  
%<dir%>:%>чи POSS-OBL ; 
%<abl%>:%>ди%{A%}ди POSS-OBL ; 
%<ben%>:%>г%{O%} POSS-OBL ; ! FIXME: -го/-гу [Front], -гу [Back]
%<ins%>:%>ди POSS-OBL ; 

LEXICON NUMBER 

%<sg%>: CASE ; 
%<pl%>:%>с%{A%}л CASE ; 
%<pl%>%<loc%>:%>с%{A%}л%>д%{O%}л%{A%} POSS-LOC ; 

LEXICON N-OGDA

%<n%>: NUMBER ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:%>л%{A%} POSS-LOC ; 

LEXICON N-NIITSJEN

%<n%>: NUMBER ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:%>д%{O%}л%{A%} POSS-LOC ; 

LEXICON N-EKTE

%<n%>%<sg%>:тэ CASE ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:э%>с%{A%}л CASE ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:тэ%>л%{A%} POSS-LOC ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:э%>с%{A%}л%>д%{O%}л%{A%} POSS-LOC ; 

LEXICON N-VINO

%<n%>: NUMBER ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:%>л%{A%} POSS-LOC ; 

LEXICON N-GALSTUK

%<n%>: NUMBER ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:%>д%{O%}л%{A%} POSS-LOC ; 



LEXICON PRON-PERS-12-OBL

%<sg%>%<acc%>:мбинэ # ;
%<sg%>%<ins%>:нди # ;
%<sg%>%<dat%>:нду # ;
%<sg%>%<loc%>:ндулэ # ;
%<sg%>%<dir%>:нчи # ;
%<sg%>%<abl%>:ндиэди # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-MI

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>: PRON-PERS-12-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SI

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: PRON-PERS-12-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-BUE

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:э # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>: PRON-PERS-12-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SUE

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:э # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: PRON-PERS-12-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-NYOANI

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ни # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:мбани # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ндиани # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ндоани # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ндолани # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dir%>:нчиани # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ндиадиани # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-NYOANTSJI

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:нчи # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:мбачи # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ндиачи # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ндоачи # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ндолачи # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dir%>:нчиачи # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ндиадиачи # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-MEPI

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:пи # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ндии # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ндуи # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ндулэи # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<dir%>:нчии # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ндиэдии # ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-MEPERI

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:пэри # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ндиэри # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ндуэри # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ндулэри # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<dir%>:нчиэри # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:ндиэдиэри # ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-TEJ-NOM

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: K ; 

LEXICON PRON-DEM-TEJ-OBL 

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ва K ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<dir%>:чи K ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ди K ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ла K ; 

LEXICON PRON-DEM-EJ

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:й K ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:е K ; ! FIXME: CHECK

LEXICON PRON-IND-HAJA

%<prn%>%<ind%>%<sg%>: POSS-OBL-NOPASS ; 

LEXICON PRON-ITG-UJ

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sg%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON PRON-ITG-HAJ

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sg%>: POSS-OBL ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<sg%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M 

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OV

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>:а # ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>: CASE ;

LEXICON A

%<adj%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON POST-OGDA

N-OGDA ; 

LEXICON POST-NIITSJEN 

N-NIITSJEN ; 

LEXICON ADV-PART

%<adv%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: K ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ; 

LEXICON IDEO

%<ideo%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: K ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM 

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA 

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellaneous

эчиэ%<neg%>%<past%>:эчиэ # ;
эм%<neg%>:эм # ;
аба%<neg%>:аба POSS-NOM ;

LEXICON Conjunctions 

тотара̄:тотара%{ː%} CC ; ! "и"

таваӈки:таваӈки CA ; ! ""

ай:ай CA ; ! "чем ... тем ..."

LEXICON Determiners

эй:эй DET-DEM ; 
мэй:мэй DET-DEM ; 
тэй:тэй DET-DEM ; 

тамача̄:тамача%{ː%} DET-IND ; ! ""

хэм:хэм DET-QNT ; ! "весь"

LEXICON Pronouns 

ми:ми PRON-PERS-MI ;
си:си PRON-PERS-SI ;
буэ:бу PRON-PERS-BUE ;
суэ:су PRON-PERS-SUE ;

нёани:нёа PRON-PERS-NYOANI ; 
нёанчи:нёа PRON-PERS-NYOANTSJI ; 

мэ̄пи:мэ PRON-REFL-MEPI ;
мэпэри:мэ PRON-REFL-MEPERI ;

тэй:тэй PRON-DEM-TEJ-NOM ; ! ""
тэй:ча PRON-DEM-TEJ-OBL ; ! ""

эй:э PRON-DEM-EJ ; ! ""

уй:уй PRON-ITG-UJ ; ! "кто"
хай:хай PRON-ITG-HAJ ; ! ""
хамача:хамача PRON-ITG-HAJ ; ! ""

хая̄:хая%{ː%} PRON-IND-HAJA ; ! "какая из сторон"

LEXICON Numerals

эм:эм NUM ; ! "один" ! эмун(?)
дюэр:дюэр NUM ; ! "два"
илан:илан NUM ; ! "три"
дуин:дуин NUM ; ! "четыре"
тойнга:тойнга NUM ; ! "пять"
нюнгун:нюнгун NUM ; ! "шесть"
надан:надан NUM ; ! "семь"
дякпун:дякпун NUM ; ! "восемь"
хуюн:хуюн NUM ; ! "девять"
дёан:дёан NUM ; ! "десять"

LEXICON Postpositions 

боакиалани:боакиалани POST ; ! "за пределами"
кирадоани:кирадоани POST ; ! "на краю, у края"

анāдо:ана%{ː%}до POST-OGDA ; ! "без"
далиндо:далиндо POST-OGDA ; ! ""
до̄чи:до%{ː%}чи POST-OGDA ; ! ""
до:до POST-OGDA ; ! "" 
дюлиэлэ:дюлиэлэ POST-OGDA ; ! ""
дякпа:дякпа POST-OGDA ; ! ""
кэ̄ндэли:кэ%{ː%}ндэли POST-OGDA ; ! "вокруг"
талгиа:талгиа POST-OGDA ; ! "напротив"
таяла:таяла POST-OGDA ; ! ""
уектулэ:уектулэ POST-OGDA ; ! "над"
уелэ:уелэ POST-OGDA ; ! "над"
хамиактола:хамиактола POST-OGDA ; ! "вслед за"
хангиала:хангиала POST-OGDA ; ! "в стороне от"
хангиачи:хангиачи POST-OGDA ; ! "в сторону от"
холдондола:холдондола POST-OGDA ; ! "около, возле, рядом, сбоку, у"
холдондо:холдондо POST-OGDA ; ! "сбоку, возле, рядом, около"
эгдиктэ:эгдиктэ POST-OGDA ; ! "большинство, большая часть"
таон:таон POST-NIITSJEN ; ! "каждый"
оя̄:оя%{ː%} POST-OGDA ; ! "поверхность"

LEXICON ProperNouns

Уде:Уде NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Мэргэ̄н:Мэргэ%{ː%}н NP-ANT-M ; ! "Мэргэн"
Семён:Семён NP-ANT-M ; ! ""

Зарина:Зарина NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Люба:Люба NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Диана:Диана NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Света:Света NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Алина:Алина NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Катя:Катя NP-ANT-F ; ! ""

Оненко:Оненко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Дранишников:Дранишников NP-COG-OV ; ! ""

Троицкое:Троицкое NP-TOP ; ! ""

LEXICON Nouns
эктэ:эк N-EKTE ; ! "женщина"
дяка:дяка N-OGDA ; ! "вещь"
хасар:хасар N-NIITSJEN ; ! "крыло"
адоли:адоли N-OGDA ; ! "невод"
айсин:айсин N-NIITSJEN ; ! "золото"
амоан:амоан N-NIITSJEN ; ! "озеро"
андаха:андаха N-OGDA ; ! "незнакомец"
балдин:балдин N-NIITSJEN ; ! "жизнь"
бо̄бой:бо%{ː%}бой N-NIITSJEN ; ! "драгоценность"
боло:боло N-OGDA ; ! "осень"
бэ̄:бэ%{ː%} N-OGDA ; ! "приманка"
бэюн:бэюн N-NIITSJEN ; ! "лось"
гаса:гаса N-OGDA ; ! "птица"
гира̄н:гира%{ː%}н N-NIITSJEN ; ! "шаг"
гормахон:гормохон N-NIITSJEN ; ! "заяц" ! Dir/LR ! Err/Orth
горо:горо N-OGDA ; ! "даль"
дай:дай N-NIITSJEN ; ! "чан шум"
дака:дака N-OGDA ; ! "свекровь"
дирэ̄н:дирэ%{ː%}н N-NIITSJEN ; ! "наковальня"
диха:диха N-OGDA ; ! "деньги"
дэ̄дун:дэ%{ː%}дун N-NIITSJEN ; ! "красивая"
дэкту:дэкту N-OGDA ; ! "ящик"
дямпа̄н:дямпа%{ː%}н N-NIITSJEN ; ! "полог"
илхин:илхин N-NIITSJEN ; ! "десна"
ирга:ирга N-OGDA ; ! "тоня"
каокан:каокан N-NIITSJEN ; ! "горло"
капкан:капкан N-GALSTUK ; ! "капкан"
качама:качама N-OGDA ; ! "рукавица"
комсомол:комсомол N-GALSTUK ; ! "комсомол"
куб:куб N-GALSTUK ; ! "куб"
кэкӯкэ̄н:кэку%{ː%}кэ%{ː%}н N-NIITSJEN ; ! "кукушечка"
кэчӣ:кэчи%{ː%} N-OGDA ; ! "сазан"
май:май N-GALSTUK ; ! "май"
молоко:молоко N-VINO ; ! "молоко"
мочо:мочо N-OGDA ; ! "бестолковщина"
мудур:мудур N-NIITSJEN ; ! "дракон"
солиа:солиа N-OGDA ; ! "сторона"
сэктэпун:сэктэпун N-NIITSJEN ; ! "матрац"
сэпэриэктэ:сэпэриэктэ N-OGDA ; ! "колючка"
тора:тора N-OGDA ; ! "столб"
трубка:трубка N-VINO ; ! "трубка"
тунепун:тунепун N-NIITSJEN ; ! "трость"
тэде:тэде N-OGDA ; ! "правда"
урэктэ:урэктэ N-OGDA ; ! "хворостина"
хадён:хадён N-NIITSJEN ; ! "имущество"
хурмэ:хурмэ N-OGDA ; ! "игла"
хурэкэн:хурэкэн N-NIITSJEN ; ! "горка"
чӣктэ:чи%{ː%}ктэ N-OGDA ; ! "вошь"
э̄дэн:э%{ː%}дэн N-NIITSJEN ; ! "дурак"
элбэнэ:элбэнэ N-OGDA ; ! "парус"
эукэн:эукэн N-NIITSJEN ; ! "невестка"
ниэчэ̄кэ̄н:ниэчэ%{ː%}кэ%{ː%}н N-NIITSJEN ; ! "птичка"
нуктэ:нуктэ N-OGDA ; ! "волос"
омо:омо N-OGDA ; ! "гнездо"
отон:отон N-NIITSJEN ; ! "корыто"
паси:паси N-OGDA ; ! "кусок"
патан:патан N-NIITSJEN ; ! "полоз"
пиво:пиво N-VINO ; ! "пиво"
поро:поро N-OGDA ; ! "тетерев"
пулэ̄:пулэ%{ː%} N-NIITSJEN ; ! "избыток"
сад:сад N-GALSTUK ; ! "сад"
самолёт:самолёт N-GALSTUK ; ! "самолёт"
сианто:сианто N-OGDA ; ! "кулак"
сиар:сиар N-NIITSJEN ; ! "растяжение"
чукин:чукин N-NIITSJEN ; ! "пустяк"
подоха:потоха N-OGDA ; ! "дерево" ! Dir/LR
LEXICON Adverbs
хао:хао ADV-ITG ; ! "куда"
хаоси:хаоси ADV-ITG ; ! "куда"
хаяди:хаяди ADV-ITG ; ! "откуда"
хали:хали ADV-ITG ; ! "когда"
хони:хони ADV-ITG ; ! "как"
хай:хай ADV-ITG ; ! ""
хайла:хайла ADV-ITG ; ! "где"
хайду:хайду ADV-ITG ; ! "где"
таоси:таоси ADV ; ! "туда"
эуси:эуси ADV ; ! "сюда"
хаӈгиси:хаӈгиси ADV ; ! "в сторону"
уйлэ:уйлэ ADV ; ! "вверху"
уйси:уйси ADV ; ! "вверх"
нэ̄:нэ%{ː%} ADV ; ! "обязательно"
эсӣ%-эсӣ:эси%{ː%}%-эси%{ː%} ADV ; ! "часто, всё время"
эси:эси ADV ; ! "сейчас" 
эсӣ:эси%{ː%} ADV ; ! "только что, вот-вот"
пуӈгэл%-пуӈгэл:пуӈгэл%-пуӈгэл ADV ; ! "совершенно"
пуӈгэл%-пуӈгэл%-пуӈгэл:пуӈгэл%-пуӈгэл%-пуӈгэл ADV ; ! "совершенно"
тэечи:тэечи ADV ; ! "так"
чаачи:чаачи ADV ; ! "так"
лаӈ:лаӈ ADV ; ! "близко"
лаӈгак:лаӈгак ADV ; ! "сразу"
тиас:тиас ADV ; ! "полно"
тургэнди:тургэнди ADV ; ! "быстро"
гэ:гэ ADV ; ! ""
тэнг:тэнг ADV ; ! "только, очень"
балана:балана ADV ; ! "давно"
тул%-тул:тул%-тул ADV ; ! "все время"
дес:дес ADV ; ! "плотно"
чимана:чимана ADV ; ! "завтра"
туй:туй ADV ; ! ""
чадо:чадо ADV ; ! "тогда"
борти:борти ADV ; ! "навсегда"
лэк:лэк ADV ; ! "вдруг"
лоап:лоап ADV ; ! "сразу"
хайс:хайс ADV-PART ; ! "снова"
аба:аба ADV-PART ; ! ""
ам:ам ADV-PART ; ! ""
анами:анами ADV-PART ; ! ""
аба:аба ADV-PART ; ! "не"
ам:ам ADV-PART ; ! ""
анами:анами ADV-PART ; ! "и"
бади:бади ADV-PART ; ! ""
бай:бай ADV-PART ; ! ""
бидерэ:бидерэ ADV-PART ; ! "видимо"
биэсикэ:биэсикэ ADV-PART ; ! "же"
ек:ек ADV-PART ; ! "вплоть до"
тас:тас ADV-PART ; ! "даже"
хавой:хавой ADV-PART ; ! "ну-ка"
хайни:хайни ADV-PART ; ! "что тут"
хайрини:хайрини ADV-PART ; ! ""
хайчи:хайчи ADV-PART ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs
деп%<v%>%<tv%>%<gna_purp%>:деб%>д%{O%} POSS-OBL  ; ! Use/Norm
